Utah statutes.
23-23-14.   Landowner protection under Landowner Liability Act.

Landowners who participate in cooperative wildlife management units shall have the full protection afforded under Title 57, Chapter 14, Limitation of Landowner Liability - Public Recreation.



Amended by Chapter 258, 1997 General Session

